Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 25

Rural Electric and Community Services Cooperatives

65-25-101. Short title — Legislative findings.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rural Electric and Community Services Cooperative Act.”

The general assembly finds that rural electric cooperatives, since their inception fifty (50) years ago, have proved to be ideal business organizations in providing adequate and reliable electric services at reasonable rates throughout the rural communities of Tennessee. There are growing needs and demands for other comparable utility services in Tennessee's rural communities, including the need for television reception and programming services which are already available, for the most part, in the state's urban areas. As proved to be the case in providing electric service in rural communities, it is vital that the area coverage principle be applied in providing other utility services in the more sparsely settled areas of the state. It is, therefore, in the public's best interest that rural electric cooperatives be empowered to provide such services and that new cooperatives may be organized for such purposes.

The general assembly finds that unfair and unwelcomed efforts may be made in Tennessee, as they recently have in other states, whereby absentee-owned profit power companies will attempt the acquisition of properties and the take-over of the businesses of rural electric cooperatives, and thereby disrupt Tennessee's long-standing and successful policy of providing rural electric services through nonprofit, cooperative organizations. It is, therefore, in the public's best interest that laws affecting such efforts will provide fair and equitable due process procedures and standards so as to ensure that such acquisitions will not be accomplished if inimical to the best interests of the rural citizens who will be affected.

The general assembly further finds that Tennessee statutes currently governing electric cooperatives have not been comprehensively revised since their initial enactment. It is, therefore, in the public interest that cooperative business organizations, their respective members and the rural communities of the state would be better served by updating such statutes to make them more compatible with changed conditions and to appropriately reconcile such statutes with the new Tennessee Nonprofit Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chapters 51-68.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. § 65-25-201.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

Cross-References. Collection or reimbursement for underpayments or overpayments for electrical service, § 28-3-301.

Attorney General Opinions. Application of Open Meetings Act to rural electric cooperative, OAG 97-154, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 193 (11/10/97).

Collateral References.

Membership corporation or association or cooperative group furnishing to its members service commonly supplied by public utility, as subject to governmental regulation or to jurisdiction of public service commission. 132 A.L.R. 1495.

Use of streets and highways by cooperative electric association. 172 A.L.R. 1020.

Duty of mutual association, nonprofit organization, or cooperative to furnish utilities services. 56 A.L.R.2d 413.

65-25-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Area coverage” means that a service will be available to patrons in accordance with a financially feasible plan without regard to how thickly or sparsely patrons' premises may be located in a cooperative's areas of service;

“Board” means a cooperative's board of directors or the necessary number thereof to take action;

“Community utility services” includes broadband internet access and related services and telecommunications services, including, but not limited to, television communication services of any kind and by any means, television programming and decryption services, selling, leasing, both as lessor and lessee, servicing and repairing related equipment, including TV antenna dishes, and the furnishing for any purpose to itself or to others, including other cooperatives, information and data relative to its or their other purposes, including, if such is the case, the primary purpose. Nothing in this subdivision (3) permits a cooperative to provide cable service, as defined in § 7-59-303, or video service, as defined in § 7-59-303, without complying with the requirement to obtain a franchise as set forth in the Competitive Cable and Video Services Act, compiled in title 7, chapter 59, part 3;

“Cooperative” or “cooperatives” means one (1) or more nonprofit cooperative membership corporations heretofore or hereafter organized under or otherwise subject to this chapter, including corporations transacting business in this state pursuant to § 65-25-121 under this chapter or under its predecessor, the Electric Cooperative Law, hereinafter called “foreign corporations”;

“Lease-sale” means an agreement whereby the possession and use of assets and properties would be transferred to a lessee-purchaser for a stated or determinable term in time, during or at the end of which such lessee-purchaser would have the right and be obligated, or would have the option, to purchase and acquire, or would without further act acquire, fee simple title to such assets and properties for a price expressly stated in the agreement or for a price determinable by a formula contained in the agreement, whether or not any portion of any lease-hold or rental payments would be creditable as a part of such price;

“Member” means a person having the right to vote for the directors of a cooperative and upon other matters as provided in this chapter, a cooperative's articles of incorporation or bylaws, and includes each incorporator of a cooperative thereof, and also a husband and wife admitted to joint membership;

“Net worth” means the difference between a cooperative's assets and liabilities, which liabilities shall not include any amounts of patronage capital assigned or assignable to patrons on the cooperative's books or carried on such books even though not so assigned or assignable, determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and methods and the accounting system applicable to such cooperative, as most recently, but not more than sixty (60) days, reflected in its books of account and balance sheet prior to the date of a member meeting at which a vote will be taken on whether to sell or to lease-sell all or a substantial portion of the assets and properties which are devoted to and are used or useful in pursuing a primary purpose;

“Patron” means a person agreeing to receive or already receiving or who in the past has received one (1) or more of the services rendered by a cooperative, whether such person is a member thereof or not, and “nonmember patron” means such a person who or which is not or was not a member;

“Person” includes any natural person, firm, association, corporation, cooperative, business trust, partnership and federal, state or local governments, or departments, agencies or any other political subdivision thereof;

“Primary purpose” means one (1) of the purposes provided for in § 65-25-104(a)(1), and a “secondary purpose” means one (1) of the purposes provided for in § 65-25-104(a)(2);

“Service” or “services” includes sales, exchanges, rentals, repairs and maintenance of land, facilities, equipment, machinery, appliances, accessories and goods and the financing of their acquisition by patrons;

“Substantial portion” means ten percent (10%) or more of the value in dollars of a cooperative's assets and properties as appropriately stated in its books of account; and

“Telecommunications” does not include the furnishing of telephone service, either local or long distance, leased lines or equipment for the vocal or written transmission of messages, or any related services for which a charge is made.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; 1989, ch. 172, § 1; 1999, ch. 430, § 3; T.C.A. § 65-25-202; Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 6.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 430, § 9 provided that that act supersedes any conflicting general law, charter or metropolitan charter provisions.

Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Broadband Accessibility Act.”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in the definition of “community utility services”, inserted “broadband internet access and related services and” in the first sentence, and added the second sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 16. April 24, 2017.

65-25-103. Nonprofit organization and operation.

Electric cooperatives heretofore incorporated under the former “Electric Cooperative Law” or hereafter incorporated under this chapter shall be organized and operated on a nonprofit basis and without pecuniary gain, and shall furnish their services on an area coverage basis at the lowest cost consistent with sound business principles.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; T.C.A. § 65-25-203.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

65-25-104. Purposes — Nonprofit cooperatives.

A cooperative shall have one (1) or more of the:

Primary purposes of:

Supplying or furnishing at wholesale or retail, electric power and energy services to, and promoting the efficient use and conservation thereof by, one (1) or more patrons; or

Supplying, furnishing or exchanging wholesale power and energy to or with any other entity; and/or

Secondary purposes of:

Supplying or furnishing other community utility services as provided in §§ 65-25-102(3) and 65-25-131;

Providing management or operating services by contract with any cooperative, utility district, municipality, or other entity engaged in the provision of community services or of services including, but not limited to, water, sewer, and natural gas; and

Promoting economic and industrial development through participation, including either as a borrower or as a lender, in any economic or industrial development program established by any agency of the United States or of the state of Tennessee.

A cooperative existing prior to, or coming into existence on or after, April 7, 1988, may, without further action other than the adoption by its board of a resolution to that effect, have, and may engage in business for, one (1) or more of the secondary purposes, and may, subject to any approvals by its members that may otherwise be required by this chapter, after engaging in such business abandon the same by the adoption by its board of a resolution to that effect.

A cooperative having the primary purpose may be the only incorporator and member or one (1) of the incorporators and members of another cooperative having a primary purpose and/or a secondary purpose; and a cooperative not having a primary purpose may be the only incorporator and member or one (1) of the incorporators and members of another cooperative having a secondary purpose only.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a cooperative having a primary purpose shall not, in pursuance of one (1) or more secondary purposes, burden, obstruct, prevent, interfere with, jeopardize, impair, delay, or lower the quality, reliability or adequacy, or increase the cost of, the pursuance and achievement of a primary purpose. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing sentence, in the business and affairs of the cooperative, including its ownership of and titles to, or its interests as mortgagor or mortgagee or as lessor or lessee in, any property of any kind or estate whatever, real or personal:

Its conduct of business in pursuance of a primary purpose and of each of its secondary purposes shall be separately accounted for, so that the costs, expenses, expenditures, assets, properties, liabilities, obligations, revenues, receipts, capital indebtedness, equity, book value, net worth and other information necessary to reveal the operations and financial and other conditions of its business for each may be accurately ascertained; and its books and records shall be so set up and kept that, at any reasonable time after normal periods of business accounting and reporting and after a reasonable time following the end of each fiscal year, such ascertainment, including the determination of the pro rata amounts of patronage or the amounts of equity, if any, of the patrons in respect of its business for each such purpose, may be made; and

It will not so operate as to permit its income from business transacted for one (1) or more secondary purposes to be such, in amount or as a percentage of its total income, as to prevent it from being able to obtain or to cause it to lose exemption from federal income taxation relative to a primary purpose.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; 1993, ch. 139, § 1; 1999, ch. 430, § 5; 2000, ch. 592, § 1; T.C.A. § 65-25-204; Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 7.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 430, § 9 provided that that act supersedes any conflicting general law, charter or metropolitan charter provisions.

Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Broadband Accessibility Act.”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “§§ 65-25-102(3) and 65-25-131;” for “§§ 65-25-102(3), 65-25-105(c) and 65-25-131;” at the end of (a)(2)(A).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 16. April 24, 2017.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of electric cooperative to provide broadband internet service. OAG 14-33, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 35 (3/18/14).

65-25-105. Powers of cooperative — Effect of chapter on third-party contractors.

Not inconsistent with or in lieu of, but in addition to, the powers set forth in title 48, chapter 53, a cooperative has the power to:

Have a corporate seal and alter the same at will; provided, that it need not have, nor shall it for any purpose be necessary for it to use, such a seal;

Become a member in or stockholder of one (1) or more other nonprofit cooperatives, corporations or other legal entities and to own the same, wholly or in part;

Solely on its own, or jointly, as tenant in common or as a partner with one (1) or more other entities, construct, purchase, take, receive, lease as lessee or lessor, or otherwise acquire, and own, hold, use, equip, maintain, and operate and sell, assign, transfer, convey, exchange, lease back, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise dispose of or encumber any and all property, of whatever kind or nature and of whatever estate, real and personal, tangible and intangible, including choses in action;

Purchase or otherwise acquire, and own, lease as lessor or lessee, lease back, hold, use, and exercise, and sell, assign, transfer, convey, mortgage, pledge, hypothecate, or otherwise dispose of or encumber, franchises, rights, privileges, licenses, rights-of-way, and easements;

Secure any of its liabilities or obligations by mortgage, pledge, deed of trust, or any other encumbrance upon any or all of its then-owned or after-acquired real or personal property, assets, franchises, revenues, or income;

Make any and all contracts necessary or convenient for the full exercise of the powers in this chapter granted, including, but not limited to, contracts with any person, federal agency, or municipality, for the purchase or sale of electric power and energy and, in connection with any such electric power and energy contract, stipulate and agree to such covenants, terms, and conditions as the board may deem appropriate, including covenants, terms, and conditions with respect to resale rates, financial and accounting methods, services, operation and maintenance practices, and, consistent with § 65-25-112, the manner of disposing of the revenues of the properties operated and maintained by the cooperative;

Conduct its business and exercise any or all of its powers within or without this state;

Adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws;

Organize and promote and otherwise foster and participate in, through membership or ownership, including stock ownership, community, regional, or statewide or national organizations whose purposes are or include the promotion and assistance of economic, industrial or commercial development which the board of the cooperative determines will, or likely will, result in economic benefits to the cooperative or its members;

Do and perform any and all other acts and things and have and exercise any and all other powers which may be necessary, convenient, or appropriate to accomplish the cooperative's purpose or purposes;

With respect to a primary purpose and the secondary purpose of supplying telecommunications and broadband internet access and related services, but without limiting the generality or particularity of subdivisions (a)(1)-(10), construct, maintain, and operate, and allow others, so long as such others are permitted by law to operate such systems within the cooperative's service area, to operate, electric, or other telecommunications or broadband internet access and related services transmission and distribution lines or other conducting or communications facilities along, upon, under, and across all of the following:

Real property, personal property, rights of way and easements owned, held, or otherwise used by the cooperative. Any easement owned, held, or otherwise used by the cooperative in pursuit of a primary purpose may be used for any secondary purpose; and

Public thoroughfares, including, but not limited to, all roads, highways, streets, alleys, bridges, and causeways and publicly owned lands if the applicable authorities having jurisdiction over the public thoroughfares and lands consent, but consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or conditioned for the purpose of enabling the authority to gain competitive advantage with respect to the rendition by the authority or any other entity of a service that the cooperative also has a right to render; and

With respect to a primary purpose, but without limiting the generality or particularity of subdivisions (a)(1)-(11):

Generate, manufacture, purchase, acquire, and transmit, and transform, supply, distribute, furnish, deliver, sell, and dispose of, electric power and energy;

Make loans to persons to whom electric power or energy is or will be supplied by the cooperative for the purpose of, and otherwise to assist such persons in, wiring their premises and installing therein electric and plumbing fixtures, appliances, apparatus, and equipment of any and all kinds and character, and, in connection therewith, purchase, acquire, lease, sell, distribute, install, and repair such electric and plumbing fixtures, appliances, apparatus, and equipment, and accept, or otherwise acquire, and sell, assign, transfer, endorse, pledge, hypothecate and otherwise dispose of, notes, bonds and other evidences of indebtedness and any and all types of security therefor; and

Condemn either the fee or such other right, title, interest or easement in and to property as the board may deem necessary, and such property or interest in such property may be so acquired, whether or not the same is owned or held for public use by corporations, associations, cooperatives or persons having the power of eminent domain, or otherwise held or used for public purposes, and such power of condemnation may be exercised in the mode of procedure prescribed by title 29, chapter 16, or in the mode or method of procedure prescribed by any other applicable statutory provisions now in force or hereafter enacted for the exercise of the power of eminent domain; provided, that no property which is owned or held for public use, nor any interest therein, shall be condemned if, in the judgment of the court the condemnation of such property or interest therein will obstruct, prevent, burden, interfere with, or unduly inconvenience the continued use of such property for the public use to which it is devoted at the time the same is sought to be condemned; provided further, that where title to any property sought to be condemned is defective, it shall be passed by decree of court; provided further, that where condemnation proceedings become necessary, the court in which such proceedings are filed shall, upon application by the cooperative and upon the posting of a bond with the clerk of the court in such amount as the court may deem commensurate with the value of the property, order that the right of possession shall issue immediately or as soon and upon such terms as the court, in its discretion, may deem proper and just; but provided further, that in cases where condemnation of property already devoted to a public use is sought, no order as to right of possession shall issue until it is finally determined that the condemnor is entitled to condemn such property. The power of eminent domain provided by this subdivision (a)(12)(C) shall be supplemental to, not in lieu of or in conflict with, § 48-51-103 of the Tennessee Nonprofit Corporation Act.

All of the powers conferred by this section are to be exercised by a cooperative for rendering one (1) or more services to persons who or which are its members and to other persons, not to exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the number of persons who or which are its members; provided, that whenever in the sole judgment of its board such is necessary to acquire or to protect and preserve a cooperative's exemption from federal income taxation relative to a primary or secondary purpose, a cooperative may require new nonmember patron applicants or existing nonmember patrons to become members as a condition of initially receiving or of continuing to receive such service.

This chapter does not affect, abrogate, or eliminate any obligation of a cooperative's third-party contractors that are permitted by law to operate within the cooperative's service area to comply with applicable permitting requirements that the cooperative is subject to with respect to property that is held or controlled by a railroad company.

In addition to all other powers set forth in this chapter, a cooperative may make contributions for bona fide charitable purposes and accept excess receipts pursuant to programs approved by the board of directors, which programs may include, but are not limited to, programs in which bills for electric power are rounded up to the next dollar when the amount of any excess receipt due to rounding is shown as a separate line on the electric bill.

Excess receipts accepted by a cooperative pursuant to programs authorized by subdivision (d)(1) are not considered revenue to the cooperative and the cooperative may only use the excess receipts for charitable purposes.

This subsection (d) prohibits discrimination by a cooperative in the distribution of excess receipts for bona fide charitable purposes to organizations whose mission is to assist persons regardless of their race, color, creed, religion, national origin, gender, disability, or age.

A cooperative that establishes a program authorized by subdivision (d)(1) on or after January 1, 2021, shall not enroll any customer into the program without the express consent of the customer.

A customer who is enrolled in a program authorized by subdivision (d)(1) may opt out of the program by providing notice to the cooperative of the customer's desire to cease participation in the program.

Upon receiving an opt-out notice from a customer, the cooperative shall remove the customer from enrollment in the program no later than the first day of the customer's next regular billing cycle that begins no fewer than thirty (30) days after the date of the customer's opt-out notice.

Any cooperative that on June 3, 2019, utilizes a program authorized by subdivision (d)(1) and operates the program on an opt-out basis shall send a written notice to each cooperative customer no later than November 1, 2020, that contains, but is not limited to, the following information:

A statement that the cooperative utilizes a program authorized by subdivision (d)(1), the program is operated on an opt-out basis, and a description of the program;

Notification that a customer whose bill is currently rounded up by the cooperative has the right to opt out of participation in the program; and

Contact information for the cooperative and instructions on how the customer may contact the cooperative to opt out of participation in the program.

The written notice required by this subdivision (d)(5) may be provided to the customer by electronic means and may accompany a regular billing statement, at the discretion of the cooperative.

A cooperative that on June 3, 2019, utilizes a program authorized by subdivision (d)(1) and operates the program on an opt-out basis that fails to send the notice required by this subdivision (d)(5) shall, on and after January 1, 2021, cease operating the program on an opt-out basis and shall not operate a program unless operated in compliance with subdivision (d)(4).

Any cooperative that utilizes a program authorized by subdivision (d)(1) and that maintains a website that is accessible by the general public shall publish in a conspicuous location on the website by November 1, 2020, and throughout the duration of the cooperative's utilization of the program, the following information:

A statement that the cooperative utilizes a program authorized by subdivision (d)(1) and a description of the program;

Notification that a customer whose bill is currently rounded up by the cooperative has the right to opt out of participation in the program; and

Contact information for the cooperative and instructions on how the customer may contact the cooperative to opt into or out of participation in the program.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; 1989, ch. 172, § 2; 1999, ch. 430, § 1; 2000, ch. 592, § 2; 2000, ch. 665, § 1; 2002, ch. 512, § 1; 2005, ch. 426, § 2; T.C.A. § 65-25-205; Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 8; 2018, ch. 570, § 1; 2019, ch. 508, § 5; 2020, ch. 631, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 430, § 9 provided that that act supersedes any conflicting general law, charter or metropolitan charter provisions.

Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Broadband Accessibility Act.”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment deleted former (c) which read: “Neither this chapter nor any other law shall be construed to authorize a cooperative to own, operate or otherwise acquire a legal or beneficial interest in a city-franchised or county-franchised cable television system; provided, that each cooperative may, within its service area and with the authorization of its board, contract to establish a cable joint venture with an entity that is a current franchise holder under title 7, chapter 59, within the cooperative's service area and has been operating, either itself or its predecessor franchise holder, for not less than three (3) years at the time of the establishment of the cable joint venture. A cable joint venture shall be authorized to provide cable service, two-way video transmission, video programming, internet services, and other like services and shall comply in all respects with the requirements of § 65-25-130. The authority to establish a cable joint venture shall not apply to areas served by any existing telephone cooperative that has been providing cable service for not less than ten (10) years under the authority of the federal communications commission.”

The 2018 amendment rewrote (a)(11) which read: “With respect to a primary purpose and the secondary purpose of supplying telecommunications services, but without limiting the generality or particularity of subdivisions (a)(1)-(10), construct, maintain, and operate electric and/or other telecommunication transmission and distribution lines or other conducting or communications facilities along, upon, under, and across all public thoroughfares, including, without limitation, all roads, highways, streets, alleys, bridges, and causeways, and upon, under, and across all publicly owned lands; provided, that the respective authorities having jurisdiction thereover shall consent thereto; provided, however, that such consent shall not be unreasonably withheld or conditioned or withheld or conditioned for the purpose of enabling such an authority to gain competitive advantage with respect to the rendition by itself or any other entity of a service which the cooperative also has a right to render; and”.

The 2019 amendment, in (d)(1) and (d)(2), substituted “are not” for “shall not be”; in (d)(1) and (d)(3), substituted “excess receipts” for “voluntary contributions”; in (d)(1), substituted “may” for “shall have the power and authority to”, and substituted “the amount of any excess receipt due to rounding” for “such contribution”; in (d)(2), substituted “Excess receipts” for “Contributions”, substituted “the cooperative may” for “shall be used”, and inserted “use the excess receipts”; in (d)(3), inserted a comma following “disability”; and added (d)(4)–(d)(6).

The 2020 amendment added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 228, § 16. April 24, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 570, § 2. March 16, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 508, § 6. June 3, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 631, § 2. March 20, 2020.

Cross-References. Telecommunications services, § 65-25-134.

Attorney General Opinions. A city charter and T.C.A. § 65-25-205(a)(11), when read together, authorized the city to impose a reasonable fee upon an electric cooperative for the use of city rights-of-way, OAG 00-145, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 147 (9/20/00).

Authority of electric cooperative to provide broadband internet service. OAG 14-33, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 35 (3/18/14).

Rural Electric and Community Services Cooperatives — Charitable Contributions. OAG 15-61, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 61 (7/28/15).

65-25-106. Bylaws.

The original bylaws of a cooperative shall be adopted by its board. Thereafter, bylaws shall be changed by adoption, amendment, or repeal by its members, except that:

The members may, by bylaw provision, delegate to the board the power to change all or any specified provision of the bylaws, but such delegation shall not forfeit or restrict the right of the members thereafter to change such provision, whether or not the board has theretofore exercised such delegated power; and

Either the board or the members of a cooperative may change any bylaw when, as established by law, such bylaw is illegal or has become a legal nullity.

A bylaw may not be changed unless a copy or an accurate summary explanation thereof is contained in or with the notice of the member or board meeting at which it is to be acted upon; a proposed change so noticed may be amended from the floor of a board meeting if the floor amendment is germane thereto, but it may not be so amended from the floor of a member meeting unless such floor amendment is germane thereto and the bylaws provide that such floor amendment is allowable. Except as may otherwise be determined by the board, a change of the bylaws proposed by individual members shall not be so noticed to or acted upon by the members at a member meeting unless a petition setting forth with particularity the wording of the proposed change shall be filed with the cooperative over the signatures of as many as, but no less than, fifty (50) members at least forty-five (45) days prior to the date of such member meeting; provided, that the board need not notice any bylaw change proposed by such a petition if it determined that, if adopted, the change would be illegal or a legal nullity. The time of the effectiveness of any change shall be as determined by its own wording or as fixed in the wording of the resolution by which it is adopted.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; T.C.A. § 65-25-206.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.

65-25-107. Board of directors.

The business and affairs of a cooperative shall be managed under the direction of a board of not less than five (5) directors, each of whom shall be a member of the cooperative or, if the cooperative's membership consists wholly of one (1) or more other cooperatives, a member, a director or an executive or administrative officer or employee of such one (1) or more member cooperatives. The bylaws shall prescribe the number of directors, their qualifications, other than those provided for in this chapter, the manner of holding meetings of the board and of the election of successors to directors who shall resign, die, or otherwise be incapable of or disqualified from acting, and any other rule, manner, procedure or matter relating to the board and its exercise of the powers conferred upon it by this chapter or by other law, the articles of incorporation or the bylaws.

Directors may, but only if so provided in a cooperative's bylaws, be removed and their successors thereupon elected by the members; provided, that no director shall be so removable except upon the basis of a written charge, and the presentation of some evidence in support thereof, that such director has been guilty of an act or omission adversely affecting the business and affairs of the cooperative and amounting to actionable negligence, malfeasance, misfeasance or nonfeasance, or fraud or criminal conduct; further, that no director shall be removable from office, either by the members or by judicial decree, or be otherwise civilly liable, for the reason that such director, in good faith and believing such to be in the best interests of the cooperative and of its present and future members, failed or declined to support, or that such director opposed:

A proposal to sell or lease-sell all or a substantial portion of the cooperative's assets and properties or to dissolve the cooperative;

A motion to notify the cooperative's members of a proposal received by the cooperative for such a sale, lease-sale or dissolution; or

A motion or any other effort to call a meeting of the cooperative's members to consider and act upon a proposal for such a sale, lease-sale or dissolution.

Directors named in articles of incorporation, consolidation or merger, as the case may be, shall hold office until the next following annual meeting of the members or until their successors shall have been elected and qualified. At each annual meeting of the members or, in case such a meeting shall not be held or shall not for any reason elect directors otherwise scheduled to be elected, at an adjournment of such meeting or at the next annual meeting of the members or at any earlier special member meeting called for that purpose, the members shall elect directors to hold office until the next following annual member meeting, except as otherwise provided in subsection (d), and each director so elected shall hold office for the term for which such director is elected or until a successor shall have been elected and qualified. If the bylaws so provide, directors may be elected solely by mail ballot, delivered to the cooperative either by mail or any other reasonable means of delivery at least three (3) business days prior to the date on which the annual meeting of the members is scheduled to be held. The secretary shall announce the winner or winners at such meeting, or by timely written communication mailed to all members if for any reason the meeting is not duly held, and the persons so elected shall take office at the board meeting first held on or after the date on which the member meeting was scheduled to be held.

If the bylaws so provide, directors shall be divided:

Into two (2) classes so that one half (½) of them or as near thereto as may be are elected each year for two-year terms;

Into three (3) classes so that one third (1/3) of them or as near thereto as may be are elected each year for three-year terms; or

Into four (4) classes so that one fourth (¼) of them or as near thereto as may be are elected each year for four-year terms.

A majority of the directors in office shall constitute a quorum; provided, that if a matter to be considered for action by the board is one with respect to which a director has a conflict of interest, that director shall not be counted as a director in office for the purpose of determining whether a quorum is present.

If, pursuant to the bylaws, a husband and wife hold a joint membership in a cooperative, either, but not both at the same time, may serve as a director.

All of a cooperative's powers shall be vested in and exercised by the board, except such as are conferred upon or reserved to the members by this chapter and any other applicable law or the cooperative's articles of incorporation or bylaws.

The board of directors of the cooperative shall, within ninety (90) days following July 1, 2008, adopt a written policy and make it available to the members of the cooperative concerning the manner in which a member of the cooperative may appear before the board.

Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2; 2008, ch. 858, § 1; T.C.A. § 65-25-207.

Code Commission Notes.

Former part 1 of this chapter was deleted and former part 2 was renumbered as T.C.A. §§ 65-25-101 to 65-25-135 by authority of the Code Commission in 2015.